Hawaii statutes.
§323F-23 Exemption from taxation. The
corporation and each regional system board shall be exempt from paying any:

(1) Assessments levied by any county; and

(2) State taxes of any kind. [L 1996, c 262, pt of §2;
am L 2007, c 290, §32]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next